Utah statutes.
24-4-116.   Criminal Forfeiture Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Criminal Forfeiture Restricted Account."

(2)  Proceeds from forfeited property and forfeited money through state forfeitures shall be deposited into the account.

(3)  Money in the account shall be appropriated to the commission for implementing the program under Section 24-4-117.



Enacted by Chapter 394, 2013 General Session

